Hawaii statutes.
PART 3.
SPOUSE AND CHILDREN UNPROVIDED FOR IN WILLS

§560:2-301 Entitlement of spouse or
reciprocal beneficiary; premarital will. (a) If a testator's surviving
spouse married the testator, or the testator's reciprocal beneficiary entered
into a reciprocal beneficiary relationship with the testator, after the
testator executed the testator's will, the surviving spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary is entitled to receive, as an intestate share, no less than the
value of the share of the estate the spouse or reciprocal beneficiary would
have received if the testator had died intestate as to that portion of the
testator's estate, if any, that neither is devised to a child of the testator
who was born before the testator married the surviving spouse or entered into a
reciprocal beneficiary relationship with the surviving reciprocal beneficiary
and who is not a child of the surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary, nor
is devised to a descendant of such a child or passes under section 560:2-603 or
560:2-604 to such a child or to a descendant of such a child, unless:

(1) It appears from the will or other evidence that
the will was made in contemplation of:

(A) The testator's marriage to the surviving
spouse; or

(B) The testator's entering into a reciprocal
beneficiary relationship with the reciprocal beneficiary;

(2) The will expresses the intention that it is to be
effective notwithstanding any subsequent marriage, or reciprocal beneficiary
relationship; or

(3) The testator provided for the spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary by transfer outside the will and the intent that the transfer be in
lieu of a testamentary provision is shown by the testator's statements or is
reasonably inferred from the amount of the transfer or other evidence.

(b) In satisfying the share provided by this
section, devises made by the will to the testator's surviving spouse, or
reciprocal beneficiary, if any, are applied first, and other devises, other
than a devise to a child of the testator who was born before the testator
married the surviving spouse, or entered a reciprocal beneficiary relationship
with the reciprocal beneficiary, and who is not a child of the surviving spouse
or reciprocal beneficiary, or a devise or substitute gift under section
560:2-603 or 560:2-604 to a descendant of such a child, abate as provided in
section 560:3-902. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1; am L 1997, c 383, §15]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next